Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0922, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Essential community supports. (a) The purpose of the essential community supports program is to provide targeted services to persons deleted text begin age 65 and olderdeleted text end who need essential community support, but whose needs do not meet the level of care required for nursing facility placement under section 144.0724, subdivision 11new text begin , and who are either 60 years of age or older or are persons with dementianew text end . (b) Essential community supports are available not to exceed $400 per person per month. Essential community supports may be used as authorized within an authorization period not to exceed 12 months. Services must be available to a person who: (1) is age deleted text begin 65deleted text end new text begin 60new text end or oldernew text begin or has dementianew text end ; (2) is not eligible for medical assistance; (3) has received a community assessment under section 256B.0911, subdivisions 17 to 21, 23, 24, or 27, and does not require the level of care provided in a nursing facility; (4) meets the financial eligibility criteria deleted text begin for the alternative care program under section 256B.0913, subdivision 4deleted text end new text begin under subdivision 3new text end ; (5) has an assessment summary; and (6) has been determined by a community assessment under section 256B.0911, subdivisions 17 to 21, 23, 24, or 27, to be a person who would require provision of at least one of the following services, as defined in the approved elderly waiver plan, in order to maintain their community residence: (i) adult day services; (ii) caregiver support; (iii) homemaker support; (iv) chores; (v) a personal emergency response device or system; (vi) home-delivered meals; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (vii) community living assistance as defined by the commissionernew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (viii) respite carenew text end . (c) The person receiving any of the essential community supports in this subdivision must also receive service coordination, not to exceed $600 in a 12-month authorization period, as part of their assessment summary. (d) A person who has been determined to be eligible for essential community supports must be reassessed at least annually and continue to meet the criteria in paragraph (b) to remain eligible for essential community supports. (e) The commissioner is authorized to use federal matching funds for essential community supports as necessary and to meet demand for essential community supports as outlined in subdivision 2, and that amount of federal funds is appropriated to the commissioner for this purpose. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0922, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Financial eligibility criteria. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for essential community supports, a person may have an income up to 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the household size. When determining financial eligibility under this subdivision, the commissioner must use the income methodology described in section 256B.056, subdivision 1a, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) No asset limit applies to a person eligible for essential community supports. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAREGIVER RESPITE SERVICES GRANTS.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for caregiver respite services grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.9756. new text end